New York, session 2025-2026, A8410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision 7 of section 1867 of 2 the public authorities law, as added by section 1 of part RR of chapter 3 58 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) The authority shall submit to the governor, the chair of the 5 senate finance committee, [and] the chair of the assembly ways and means 6 committee, the chair of the senate energy and telecommunications commit- 7 tee, and the chair of the assembly energy committee, and publish on the 8 authority's public website a semi-annual report for the time period 9 ending March thirty-first no later than June first and for the time 10 period ending September thirtieth no later than December first of each 11 year detailing the authority's activities for the previous six month 12 reporting period. 13 (b) The semi-annual report required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this 14 subdivision shall include information with respect to all proceeds 15 collected and administered by the authority pursuant to an order of the 16 public service commission, including assessments, fees, taxes, trans- 17 fers, corporate income or surcharges imposed on energy consumers or 18 power generators. The semi-annual report shall include, at a minimum, 19 the following: 20 1. total revenues collected by the authority in the reporting period; 21 2. a list of requests for proposals, program opportunity notices, or 22 similar solicitations, that have been issued in the reporting period; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13027-02-5 A. 8410 2 1 3. a description of the criteria and standards utilized for awarding a 2 request for proposal, a program opportunity notice, or similar solicita- 3 tion; 4 4. a regional report on all projects selected for funding by the 5 authority during the reporting period, including the county and utility 6 service territory in which the project is located, and the total value 7 of these projects statewide and by region; 8 5. all disbursements or expenditures of revenues pursuant to a request 9 for proposal, a program opportunity notice, or similar solicitation; 10 [and] 11 6. a list of all contracts executed and completed during the reporting 12 period including a description of each project; and 13 7. a brief summary of all proceeds collected and administered by the 14 authority pursuant to an order of the public service commission or 15 pursuant to regulation, including, but not limited to, assessments, 16 fees, taxes, transfers, corporate income or surcharges, imposed on ener- 17 gy consumers or power generators, including a description and basic 18 accounting of all programs operated by the authority, either independ- 19 ently or jointly with another state entity, that utilize such proceeds. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 21 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.